Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.030

Disturbing school, school activities or meetings—Penalty.

Any person who shall willfully create a disturbance on school premises during school hours or at school activities or school meetings shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, the penalty for which shall be a fine in any sum not more than fifty dollars.

[ 1984 c 258 s 315; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 57; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.060. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 361 s 12; RRS s 5055; prior: 1903 c 156 s 12; 1897 c 118 s 170; 1890 p 383 s 87. Formerly RCW 28A.87.060, 28.87.060.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.